lt-LT: Išsiskyrimo mechanizmas: Kramtomas; Šnypštus; Prailginto atpalaidavimo; Guminukas; Greito atpalaidavimo; Liposominis; Purškiklis; Po liežuviu; Palaikomo atpalaidavimo; Kita
el: Μηχανισμός απελευθέρωσης: Μασώμενο; Αναβράζον; Παρατεταμένης αποδέσμευσης; Ζελεδάκι; Άμεσης αποδέσμευσης; Λιποσωμικό; Σπρέι; Υπογλώσσιο; Βραδείας αποδέσμευσης; Άλλο
ja: 放出メカニズム: チュアブル; 発泡性; 徐放性; グミ; 即放性; リポソーム; スプレー; 舌下; 持続放出; その他
pl: Mechanizm uwalniania: Do żucia; Musujący; Przedłużone uwalnianie; Żelki; Natychmiastowe uwalnianie; Liposomalny; Natrysk; Podjęzykowy; Utrzymujące uwalnianie; Inne
tr: Salım mekanizması: Çiğnenebilir; Efervesan; Uzatılmış salım; Jelibon; Hızlı salım; Lipozomal; Sprey; Dil altı; Sürekli salım; Diğer
es: Mecanismo de liberación: Masticable; Efervescente; Liberación prolongada; Gomita; Liberación inmediata; Liposomal; Aerosol; Sublingual; Liberación sostenida; Otros
de: Freisetzungsmechanismus: Kaubar; Brause; Verzögerte Freisetzung; Gummibärchen; Sofortige Freisetzung; Liposomal; Spray; Sublingual; Nachhaltige Freisetzung; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 釋放機制: 咀嚼式; 泡騰式; 緩釋; 軟糖; 速釋; 脂質體; 噴霧; 舌下; 持續釋放; 其他
bg-BG: Механизъм на освобождаване: За дъвчене; Ефервесцентен; Удължено освобождаване; Гъмиран; Незабавно освобождаване; Липозомен; Спрей; Сублингвален; Поддържано освобождаване; Други
th: กลไกการปล่อย: เคี้ยวได้; ฟู่; ออกฤทธิ์นาน; กัมมี่; ออกฤทธิ์ทันที; ไลโปโซม; สเปรย์; ใต้ลิ้น; ออกฤทธิ์ต่อเนื่อง; อื่นๆ
en: Release mechanism: Chewable; Effervescent; Extended release; Gummy; Immediate release; Liposomal; Spray; Sublingual; Sustained release; Other
ro-RO: Mecanism de eliberare: Masticabil; Efervescent; Eliberare prelungită; Gumat; Eliberare imediată; Lipozomal; Spray; Sublingual; Eliberare susținută; Altele
cs: Mechanismus uvolňování: Žvýkací; Šumivý; Prodloužené uvolňování; Gumový; Okamžité uvolnění; Lipozomální; Sprej; Sublingvální; Postupné uvolňování; Jiné
nb: Frigjøringsmekanisme: Tyggetablett; Brusende; Forlenget frigivelse; Gummy; Umiddelbar frigivelse; Liposomal; Spray; Sublingual; Vedvarende frigivelse; Annet
da: Frigivelsesmekanisme: Tyggetablet; Brusetablet; Forlænget frigivelse; Gummi; Øjeblikkelig frigivelse; Liposomal; Spray; Sublingual; Vedvarende frigivelse; Andet
fr: Mécanisme de libération: À mâcher; Effervescent; Libération prolongée; Gomme; Libération immédiate; Liposomal; Vaporisateur; Sublingual; Libération soutenue; Autre
sv: Frisättningsmekanism: Tuggbar; Brustablett; Förlängd frisättning; Gummitablett; Omedelbar frisättning; Liposomal; Spray; Sublingual; Långvarig frisättning; Övrigt
nl: Afgiftemechanisme: Kauwtablet; Bruistablet; Verlengde afgifte; Gummy; Onmiddellijke afgifte; Liposomaal; Spray; Sublinguaal; Gereguleerde afgifte; Andere
pt-BR: Mecanismo de liberação: Mastigável; Efervescente; Liberação prolongada; Goma; Liberação imediata; Lipossomal; Spray; Sublingual; Liberação sustentada; Outro
hr-HR: Mehanizam oslobađanja: Za žvakanje; Šumeće; Produljeno oslobađanje; Gumeni; Trenutno oslobađanje; Lipozomalni; Sprej; Sublingvalno; Održavano oslobađanje; Ostalo
hu: Kibocsátási mechanizmus: Rágótabletta; Pezsgőtabletta; Elnyújtott hatóanyag-leadás; Gumicukor; Azonnali hatóanyag-leadás; Liposzómás; Spray; Nyelv alatti; Tartós hatóanyag-leadás; Egyéb
vi: Cơ chế giải phóng: Nhai được; Sủi bọt; Giải phóng kéo dài; Kẹo dẻo; Giải phóng ngay lập tức; Liposome; Dạng xịt; Dưới lưỡi; Giải phóng duy trì; Khác
sl-SI: Mehanizem sproščanja: Žvečljivo; Šumeče; Podaljšano sproščanje; Gumijasto; Takojšnje sproščanje; Liposomski; Razpršilo; Podjezično; Trajno sproščanje; Drugo
it: Meccanismo di rilascio: Masticabile; Effervescente; Rilascio prolungato; Gommosa; Rilascio immediato; Liposomiale; Spray; Sublinguale; Rilascio sostenuto; Altro
pt-PT: Mecanismo de libertação: Mastigável; Efervescente; Libertação prolongada; Goma; Libertação imediata; Lipossómica; Pulverizador; Sublingual; Libertação sustentada; Outro
zh-CN: 释放机制: 咀嚼片; 泡腾片; 缓释; 软糖; 速释; 脂质体; 喷雾; 舌下含服; 持续释放; 其他
ru: Механизм высвобождения: Жевательный; Шипучий; Пролонгированное высвобождение; Жевательная конфета; Немедленное высвобождение; Липосомальный; Спрей; Подъязычный; Замедленное высвобождение; Другой
ko: 방출 메커니즘: 씹어먹는; 발포성; 서방형; 구미; 속방형; 리포좀; 스프레이; 설하; 지속 방출; 기타
fi: Vapautumismekanismi: Pureskeltava; Poretabletti; Pitkävaikutteinen; Kumipastilli; Nopeavaikutteinen; Liposomaalinen; Suihke; Kielen alle; Hitaasti vapautuva; Muu
sk-SK: Mechanizmus uvoľňovania: Žuvacie; Šumivé; S predĺženým uvoľňovaním; Gumené; S okamžitým uvoľňovaním; Lipozomálne; Sprej; Sublingválne; S postupným uvoľňovaním; Iné